California statutes. Penal Code
(a) There is hereby established within the Department of Corrections the Joint Venture Policy Advisory Board. The Joint Venture Policy Advisory Board shall consist of the Director of Corrections, who shall serve as chair, the Director of the Employment Development Department, and five members, to be appointed by the Governor, three of whom shall be public members, one of whom shall represent organized labor and one of whom shall represent industry. Five members shall constitute a quorum and a vote of the majority of the members in office shall be necessary for the transaction of the business of the board. Appointed members of the board shall be compensated at the rate of two hundred dollars ($200) for each day while on official business of the board and shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses. The initial terms of the members appointed by the Governor shall be for one year (one member), two years (two members), three years (one member), and four years (one member), as determined by the Governor. After the initial term, all members shall serve for four years.

(b) The board shall advise the Director of Corrections of policies that further the purposes of the Prison Inmate Labor Initiative of 1990 to be considered in the implementation of joint venture programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 6, 1990, by initiative Prop. 139.)
-------------------------------------------

2717.5.

In establishing joint venture contracts the Director of Corrections shall consider the impact on the working people of California and give priority consideration to inmate employment which will retain or reclaim jobs in California, support emerging California industries, or create jobs for a deficient labor market.

(History: Added November 6, 1990, by initiative Proposition 139.)
-------------------------------------------

2717.6.

(a) No contract shall be executed with a joint venture employer that will initiate employment by inmates in the same job classification as non-inmate employees of the same employer who are on strike, as defined in Section 1132.6 of the Labor Code, as it reads on January 1, 1990, or who are subject to lockout, as defined in Section 1132.8 of the Labor Code, as it reads on January 1, 1990.

(b) Total daily hours worked by inmates employed in the same job classification as non-inmate employees of the same joint venture employer who are on strike, as defined in Section 1132.6 of the Labor Code, as it reads on January 1, 1990, or who are subject to lockout, as defined in Section 1132.8 of the Labor Code, as it reads on January 1, 1990, shall not exceed, for the duration of the strike, the average daily hours worked for the preceding six months, or if the program has been in operation for less than six months, the average for the period of operation.

(c) The determination that a condition described in paragraph (b) above shall be made by the Director after notification by the union representing the workers on strike or subject to lockout. The limitation on work hours shall take effect 48 hours after receipt by the Director of written notice of the condition by the union.

(History: Added November 6, 1990, by initiative Proposition 139.)
-------------------------------------------

2717.7.

Notwithstanding Section 2812 of the Penal Code or any other provision of law which restricts the sale of inmate-provided services or inmate-manufactured goods, services performed and articles manufactured by joint venture programs may be sold to the public.

(History: Added November 6, 1990, by initiative Proposition 139.)
-------------------------------------------

2717.8.

The compensation of prisoners engaged in programs pursuant to contract between the Department of Corrections and joint venture employers for the purpose of conducting programs which use inmate labor shall be comparable to wages paid by the joint venture employer to non-inmate employees performing similar work for that employer. If the joint venture employer does not employ such non-inmate employees in similar work, compensation shall be comparable to wages paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the work is to be performed. Such wages shall be subject to deductions, as determined by the Director of Corrections, which shall not, in the aggregate, exceed 80 percent of gross wages and shall be limited to the following:

(1) Federal, state, and local taxes.

(2) Reasonable charges for room and board, which shall be remitted to the Director of Corrections.

(3) Any lawful restitution fine or contributions to any fund established by law to compensate the victims of crime of not more than 20 percent, but not less than 5 percent, of gross wages, which shall be remitted to the Director of Corrections for disbursement.

(4) Allocations for support of family pursuant to state statute, court order, or agreement by the prisoner.

(History: Added November 6, 1990, by initiative Proposition 139.)
-------------------------------------------

2717.9.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a prisoner who participates in a joint venture program is ineligible for unemployment benefits upon his or her release from prison based upon participation in that program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 440, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 194 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Employment at Road Camps [2760. - 2772.]

2760.

The Department of Transportation of the State of California may employ or cause to be employed, prisoners confined in the state prisons in the improvement and maintenance of any state highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1549, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

2760.1.

“Department,” as used in this article, means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2761.

The Director of Corrections shall determine which prisoners shall be eligible for employment by the Department of Transportation in the improvement and maintenance of state highways, and shall establish lists of prisoners eligible for such employment. Upon the requisition of said department, the Director of Corrections shall send to the place and at the time designated the number of prisoners requisitioned or such number thereof as have been determined to be eligible for such employment and are available.

The director may return to prison any prisoner transferred to camp pursuant to this section, when the need for such prisoner’s labor has ceased or when the prisoner is guilty of any violation of the rules and regulations of the prison or camp.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1549, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

2762.

The Director of Corrections shall fix a daily rate to be expended for convict labor, and when so fixed, the Department of Transportation shall monthly set aside funds to the director to pay for this labor from funds appropriated in the Budget Act for this purpose, and where no funds are available to the Department of Transportation the director may set aside the department’s own funds to pay for this labor from funds appropriated in the Budget Act for this purpose. The Department of Corrections shall set up an account for each convict which shall be credited monthly with an amount computed by multiplying the daily rate by the number of days such convict actually performed labor during the month. Such account shall be debited monthly with the convict’s proportionate share of expenses of camp maintenance, including the expenses for food, medicine, medical attendance, clerical and accounting personnel, and the expenses necessary to maintain care and welfare facilities such as camp hospital for first aid, barbershop and cobbler shop, and the convict’s personal expenses covering his drawings from the commissary for clothing, toilet articles, candy, and other personal items. The charge for camp maintenance may be made at a standard rate determined by the department maintaining the camps to be adequate to cover expenses and shall be adjusted periodically at the discretion of the department as needs of the camp require. No charge shall be made against such account for the costs of transporting prisoners to and from prison and camp or for the expense of guarding prisoners, which items shall be paid by the Department of Corrections from appropriations made for the support of the department. The director, by regulation, may fix the maximum amount, over and above all deductions, that a convict may receive. The Department of Corrections, in computing the debits to be made to the convict’s accounts, may add not to exceed 10 percent on all items.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 798, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 798.)
-------------------------------------------

2765.

When any prisoner shall wilfully violate the terms of his employment or the rules and regulations of the Department of Corrections, the Director of Corrections may in his discretion determine what portion of all moneys earned by the prisoner shall be forfeited by the said prisoner and such forfeiture shall be deposited in the State Treasury in a fund known as the Inmate Welfare Fund of the Department of Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1666.)
-------------------------------------------

2766.

This article is not intended to restore, in whole or in part, the civil rights of any prisoner used hereunder, and such article shall not be so construed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1347.)
-------------------------------------------

2767.

No prisoner while engaged in such construction, maintenance and improvement of a state highway shall drive a motor truck or other vehicle or wagon outside of the limits established for the camp or construction work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1380.)
-------------------------------------------

2768.

Said prisoners when employed under the provisions of this article shall not be used for the purpose of building any bridge or structure of like character which requires the employment of skilled labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2770.

The Department of Transportation shall designate and supervise all road work done under the provisions of this article. It shall provide, supervise and maintain necessary camps and commissariat, except that where no funds are available to the Department of Transportation, the director may provide, erect, and maintain the necessary camps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1549, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

2771.

The Director of Corrections shall have full jurisdiction at all times over the discipline and control of the prisoners employed on said roads.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1380.)
-------------------------------------------

2772.

Any person who, without authority, interferes with or in any way interrupts the work of any prisoners employed pursuant to this article, and any person not authorized by law, who gives or attempts to give to any prisoner so employed any controlled substances or any intoxicating liquors of any kind whatever, or firearms, weapons or explosives of any kind, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and shall be disqualified from holding any state office or position in the employ of this state. Any person who interferes with the discipline or good conduct of any prisoner employed pursuant to this article, while that prisoner is in the confines or limits of the state prison road camp is
 guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not more than six months, or by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200), or by both that fine and imprisonment. Any peace officer or any officer or guard of any state prison or any superintendent of that road work, having in charge the prisoners employed upon such highways or state roads, may arrest without a warrant any person violating any provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 464.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Employment in Public Parks, Forests, etc. [2780. - 2792.]

2780.

Any department, division, bureau, commission or other agency of the State of California or the Federal Government may use or cause to be used convicts confined in the state prisons to perform work necessary and proper to be done by them at permanent, temporary, and mobile camps to be established under this article. The director may enter into contracts for the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1583.)
-------------------------------------------

2780.1.

Money received from the rendering of services under the prison camp work program shall be paid to the Treasurer monthly and shall be credited to the support appropriation of the prison rendering such services, in augmentation thereof. The appropriation to be credited shall be the appropriation current at the time of rendering the services. Nothing in this section shall apply to prison road camps established under Article 4 (commencing with Section 2760) of this chapter, except that, by mutual agreement between the Department of Transportation and the Department of Corrections, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, such prison road camps may be administered, instead, under the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1549, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

2780.5.

The Director of Corrections may, during declared fire emergencies, allow the Director of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to use prisoners for fire suppression efforts outside of the boundaries of California, not to exceed a distance in excess of 25 miles from the California border, along the borders of Oregon, Nevada, or Arizona.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2780.6.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 3370 of the Labor Code, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, shall, pursuant to subdivision (b), pay a death benefit in an amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (c) for the death of any state prison incarcerated individual hand crew member assigned to the California Conservation Camp program.

(b) The death benefit shall be paid within 60 days of the death of an incarcerated individual hand crew member to the beneficiary designated by the crew member to receive the death benefit if the crew member dies during any of the following circumstances:

(1) During, and resulting from, the performance of their duties on an active deployment.

(2) During, and resulting from, the performance of their duties completing firefighter
 Conservation Camp training exercises.

(3) While physically or mentally incapacitated due to and resulting from their performance of their duties as described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(c) The death benefit shall be the sum of the following amounts:

(1) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) An amount equal to 50 percent of the annual compensation earned by the deceased crew member
 during the 12 months immediately preceding the death of the crew member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 711, Sec. 1.   (AB 799)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2781.

The Director of Corrections shall determine which prisoners shall be eligible for employment under Section 2780, and shall establish and modify lists of prisoners eligible for such employment. Upon the requisition of an agency mentioned in Section 2780, the Director of Corrections may send to the place and at the time designated the number of prisoners requisitioned or such number thereof as have been determined to be eligible for such employment and are available.

The director may return to prison any prisoner transferred to camp pursuant to this section, when the need for such prisoner’s labor has ceased or when the prisoner is guilty of any violation of the rules and regulations of the prison or camp.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1666.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.

The director may fix a daily rate to be expended for such convict labor, and when so fixed, the agency shall monthly set aside funds to the director to pay for such labor, and where no funds are available from the agency the director may set aside the department’s own funds to pay for such labor. The director, by regulation, may authorize any or all deductions to be made from the pay due convicts as provided for convicts at road camps under Section 2762. The director, by regulation, may also fix the maximum amount, over and above all deductions, that a convict may receive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2256.)
-------------------------------------------

2785.

Whenever prisoners are paid for their labor under this article and a prisoner wilfully violates the terms of his employment or the rules of the camp or the Department of Corrections the Director of Corrections may in his discretion determine what portion of all moneys earned by the prisoner shall be forfeited by the prisoner and such forfeiture shall be deposited in the State Treasury in the fund known as the Inmate Welfare Fund of the Department of Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1666.)
-------------------------------------------

2786.

All money received pursuant to this article in the Inmate Welfare Fund of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is hereby appropriated for educational, recreational, and other purposes described in Section 5006 at the various prison camps established under this article and shall be expended by the secretary upon warrants drawn upon the State Treasury by the Controller after approval of the claims by the Department of General Services. It is the intent of the Legislature that moneys in this fund only be expended on services other than those that the department is required to provide to inmates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 249.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2786.1.

The secretary shall make weight training equipment available to inmates assigned to fire suppression efforts pursuant to this article. The weight training equipment shall be used in accordance with the provisions of Section 5010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 737, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2786.5.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(A) The Youth Offender Program Camp Pilot Program was launched by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in August 2023 at Growlersburg Conservation Camp #33 in Georgetown as a pilot program to temporarily allow incarcerated youth between 18 and 25 years of age, who have a Level III classification score or a Violent Administrative Determinant, the ability to participate in the conservation camp program on a case-by-case basis.

(B) The pilot program showed great promise, and the department expanded the pilot program to Pine Grove Youth Conservation Camp #12 in August 2024.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to make the Youth Offender Program Camp Pilot Program within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation permanent.

(b) (1) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall make permanent the Youth Offender Program Camp Pilot Program, and may, at the discretion of the secretary, expand the program to include some or all of California Conservation Camps.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “California Conservation Camps” has the same meaning as in Section 4952 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 718, Sec. 1.   (AB 952)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2787.

The agency providing work for convicts under this article shall designate and supervise all work done under the provisions of this article. The agency shall provide, erect and maintain the necessary camps, except that where no funds are available to the agency, the director may provide, erect and maintain the necessary camps. The director shall supervise and manage the necessary camps and commissariat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2256.)
-------------------------------------------

2788.

The director shall have full jurisdiction at all times over the discipline and control of the convicts performing work under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2256.)
-------------------------------------------

2790.

Any person, who, without authority, interferes with or in any way interrupts the work of any convict used pursuant to this article and any person not authorized by law, who gives or attempts to give to any state prison convict so employed any controlled substances, or any intoxicating liquors of any kind whatever, or firearms, weapons or explosives of any kind is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and shall be disqualified from holding any state office or position in the employ of this state. Any person who interferes with the discipline or good conduct of any convict used pursuant to this article, while that convict is in such camps is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction
 thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not more than six months, or by a fine of not more than four hundred dollars ($400), or by both that fine and imprisonment. Any peace officer or any officer or guard of any state prison or any superintendent of that work, having in charge the convicts used in those camps, may arrest without a warrant any person violating any provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 465.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

2791.

This article is not intended to restore, in whole or in part, the civil rights of any convict used hereunder, and such article shall not be so construed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1347.)
-------------------------------------------

2792.

Camps may be established under this article for the employment of paroled prisoners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 363.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Sale of Prison-Made Goods [2800. - 2891.]



  ARTICLE 1. Prison Industry Authority [2800. - 2818.]

2800.

There is hereby continued in existence within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority. As used in this article, “authority” means the
 California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority. Any reference to the Department of Corrections shall refer to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 35.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2800.5.

The Prison Industry Authority shall be known as the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority. Any reference to the Prison Industry Authority in this or any other code shall be construed to mean the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 36.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2801.

The purposes of the authority are:

(a) To develop and operate industrial, agricultural, and service enterprises employing prisoners in institutions under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, which enterprises may be located either within those institutions or elsewhere, all as may be determined by the authority.

(b) To create and maintain working conditions within the enterprises as much like those which prevail in private industry as possible, to ensure prisoners employed therein the opportunity to work productively, to earn funds, and to acquire or improve effective work habits and occupational skills.

(c) To operate a work program for prisoners that will ultimately be self-supporting by generating sufficient funds from the sale of products and services to pay all the expenses of the program, and one that will provide goods and services
 that are or will be used by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, thereby reducing the cost of its operation.

(1) This subdivision does not require immediate cash availability for funding retiree health care and pension liabilities above amounts established in the Budget Act, or as determined by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or the Director of Finance for the fiscal year.

(2) The California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall not establish cash reserves to support funding retiree health care and pension liabilities above the amounts specified in paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 37.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.

Commencing July 1, 2005, there is hereby continued in existence within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation a California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Board. The board shall consist of the following 11 members:

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or their designee.

(b) The Director of the Department of General Services, or
 their designee.

(c) The Secretary of Transportation, or their designee.

(d) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint two members to represent the general public.

(e) The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint two members to represent the general public.

(f) The Governor shall appoint four members. Of these, two shall be representatives of organized labor, and two shall be representatives of industry. The initial term of one of the members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly shall be two years, and the initial term of the other shall be three years. The initial term of one of the members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules shall
 be two years, and the initial term of the other shall be three years. The initial terms of the four members appointed by the Governor shall be four years. All subsequent terms of all members shall be for four years. Each member’s term shall continue until the appointment and qualification of their successor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 38.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2803.

The Secretary of the Department Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be the chairperson of the board. The chairperson shall be the administrative head of the board and shall exercise all duties and functions necessary to insure that the responsibilities of the board are successfully discharged. The board shall hold meetings on the call of the chairperson or a majority of the board. Six members of the board, including the chairperson, shall constitute a quorum. The vote of a majority of the members serving on the board is necessary for the transaction of the business of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 18.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2804.

The appointed members of the board shall receive a per diem to be determined by the chairperson, but not less than the usual per diem rate allowed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation employees during travel out of state. All members, including the chairperson, shall also receive their actual and necessary expenses of travel incurred in attending meetings of the commission and in making investigations, either as a board or individually as members of the board at the request of the chairperson. All the expenses shall be paid from the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 39.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2805.

The authority shall assume jurisdiction over the operation of all industrial, agricultural, and service operations formerly under the jurisdiction of the Correctional Industries Commission. In addition, the authority shall have the power to establish new industrial, agricultural and service enterprises which it deems appropriate, to initiate and develop new vocational training programs, and to assume jurisdiction over existing vocational training programs. The authority shall have control over and the power to buy and sell all equipment, supplies and materials used in the operations over which it assumes control and jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1549, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

2806.

(a) There is hereby constituted a permanent revolving fund in the sum of not less than seven hundred thirty thousand dollars ($730,000), to be known as the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund, and to be used to meet the expenses necessary in the purchasing of materials and equipment, salaries, construction and cost of administration of the prison industries program. The fund may also be used to refund deposits either erroneously made or made in cases where delivery of products cannot be consummated. The fund shall at all times contain the amount of at least seven hundred thirty thousand dollars ($730,000), either in cash or in receivables, consisting of raw materials, finished or unfinished products, inventory
 at cost, equipment, or any combination of the above. Money received from the rendering of services or the sale of products in the prisons and institutions under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to this article shall be paid to the State Treasurer monthly and shall be credited to the fund. At any time that the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Director of Finance jointly determine that the balance in that revolving fund is greater than is necessary to carry out the purposes of the authority, they shall so inform the Controller and request a transfer of the unneeded balance from the revolving fund to the General Fund of the State of California. The Controller is authorized to transfer balances upon request. Funds deposited in the revolving fund are not subject to annual appropriation by the Legislature and may be
 used without a time limit by the authority.

(b) The California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund is not subject to the provisions of Articles 2 (commencing with Section 13320) and 3 (commencing with Section 13335) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) Any major capital outlay project undertaken by the authority pursuant to this article shall be subject to review by the Public Works Board pursuant to the provisions of Part 10.5 (commencing with Section 15752) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 40.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2807.

(a) The authority is hereby authorized and empowered to operate industrial, agricultural, and service enterprises which will provide products and services needed by the state, or any political subdivision thereof, or by the federal government, or any department, agency, or corporation thereof, or for any other public use. Products may be purchased by state agencies to be offered for sale to inmates of the department and to any other person under the care of the state who resides in state-operated institutional facilities. Fresh meat may be purchased by food service operations in state-owned facilities and sold for onsite consumption.

(b) All things authorized to be produced under
 subdivision (a) shall be purchased by the state, or any agency thereof, and may be purchased by any county, city, district, or political subdivision, or any agency thereof, or by any state agency to offer for sale to persons residing in state-operated institutions, at the prices fixed by the authority. State agencies shall make maximum utilization of these products, and shall consult with the staff of the authority to develop new products and adapt existing products to meet their needs.

(c) All products and services provided by the authority may be offered for sale to a nonprofit organization, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The nonprofit organization is located in California and is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United
 States Code.

(2) The nonprofit organization has entered into a memorandum of understanding with a local educational agency. As used in this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, state special school, or charter school.

(3) The products and services are provided to public school students at no cost to the students or their families.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may purchase personal protective equipment from the authority or private entities, based on the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection’s needs and assessment of quality and value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 127.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2808.

The board, in the exercise of its duties, shall have all of the powers and do all of the things that the board of directors of a private corporation would do, except as specifically limited in this article, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) To enter into contracts and leases, execute leases, pledge the equipment, inventory, and supplies under the control of the authority and the anticipated future receipts of any enterprise under the jurisdiction of the authority as collateral for loans, and execute other necessary instruments and documents.

(b) To ensure that all funds received by the authority are kept in commercial
 accounts according to standard accounting practices.

(c) To arrange for an independent annual audit.

(d) To review and approve the annual budget for the authority, in order to ensure that the solvency of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund is maintained.

(1) This subdivision does not require immediate cash availability for funding retiree health care and pension liabilities above amounts established in the Budget Act, or as determined by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or the Director of Finance for the fiscal year.

(2) The California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority
 shall not establish cash reserves to support funding retiree health care and pension liabilities above the amounts specified in paragraph (1).

(e) To contract to employ a director to serve as the chief administrative officer of the authority. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the chairperson. The director shall have wide and successful experience with a productive enterprise, and have a demonstrated appreciation of the problems associated with prison management.

(f) To apply for and administer grants and contracts of all kinds.

(g) To establish, notwithstanding any other law, procedures governing the purchase of raw materials, component parts, and any other goods and services that may be needed by the
 authority or in the operation of any enterprise under its jurisdiction. Those procedures shall contain provisions for appeal to the board from any action taken in connection with them.

(h) To establish, expand, diminish, or discontinue industrial, agricultural, and service enterprises under the authority’s jurisdiction to enable it to operate as a self-supporting enterprise, to provide as much employment for inmates as is feasible, and to provide diversified work activities to minimize the impact on existing private industry in the state.

(i) To hold public hearings pursuant to subdivision (h) to provide an opportunity for persons or organizations who may be affected to appear and present testimony concerning the plans and activities of the authority. The authority shall ensure adequate
 public notice of those hearings. A new industrial, agricultural, or service enterprise that involves a gross annual production of more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall not be established unless and until a hearing concerning the enterprise has been held by a committee of persons designated by the board including at least two board members. The board shall take into consideration the effect of a proposed enterprise on California industry and shall not approve the establishment of the enterprise if the board determines it would have a comprehensive and substantial adverse impact on California industry that cannot be mitigated.

(j) To periodically determine the prices at which activities, supplies, and services shall be sold.

(k) To report to the Legislature in writing,
 on or before February 1 of each year, regarding:

(1) The financial activity and condition of each enterprise under its jurisdiction.

(2) The plans of the board regarding any significant changes in existing operations.

(3) The plans of the board regarding the development of new enterprises.

(4) A breakdown, by institution, of the number of prisoners at each institution, working in enterprises under the jurisdiction of the authority, said number to indicate the number of prisoners who are not working full time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 41.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2809.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, commencing July 1, 2005, the authority may recruit and employ civilian staff that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this article, and shall establish recruiting, testing, hiring, promotion, disciplinary, and dismissal procedures and practices which will meet the unique personnel needs of the authority. The practices may include incentives based on productivity, profit-sharing plans, or other criteria which will encourage civilian employee involvement in the productivity goals of the authority. The procedures and practices shall apply to all employees working in enterprises under the jurisdiction of the authority. The general manager shall be the appointing authority for all personnel of the authority other than the general manager.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 23.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2810.

Commencing July 1, 2005, the general manager, with the approval of the Department of Finance, may authorize the borrowing of money by the authority for purposes of any of the following:

(a) Operating the business affairs of the authority.

(b) Purchasing new equipment, materials and supplies.

(c) Constructing new facilities, or repairing, remodeling, or demolishing old facilities.
